Illinois, session 104th, HB1525.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Amusement Ride and Attraction Safety Act is 5amended by changing Section 2-1 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 85/2-1)  (from Ch. 111 1/2, par. 4051)7    Sec. 2-1. This Article shall be known and and may be cited 8as the "Amusement Ride and Attraction Safety Act".9(Source: P.A. 98-769, eff. 1-1-15.)